Massachusetts, session 194th, H3921.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. In addition to those powers conferred by G. L. c. 44, section 55 ( C ) (a), the
purpose of the Somerville Affordable Housing Trust is 1) to fund housing related social service
programs, including but not limited to, landlord-tenant mediation, legal services for tenants, case
management, homelessness prevention, and housing counseling, and 2) to fund start-up costs for
new affordable housing production initiatives. For the purpose of this section, such social service
programs do not need to be associated with a physical asset consisting of housing for income
eligible households, nor do such social services programs need to add a housing unit to the
municipality’s affordable housing stock.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1